test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3_ele_odd_kattela_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kattela - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kattela+V+Inf: kattela
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kattelen
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kattelet
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kattelee
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kattelemma
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: katteletta
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kattelhaan
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kattelin
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kattelit
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: katteli
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kattelimma
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kattelitta
     kattela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kattelthiin
     kattela+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kattelu
     kattela+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: katteltu
     kattela+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kattelheet
     kattela+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: katteleeva
     kattela+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: katteleevat
     kattela+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: katteltava
     kattela+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: katteltavat

     kattela+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kattelisin
     kattela+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kattelisit
     kattela+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kattelis
     kattela+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kattelisima
     kattela+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kattelisitta
     kattela+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: katteltais
     kattela+V+Pass+Cond: katteltais

     kattela+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kattele
     kattela+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kattelkkaa
     
     kattela+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kattelemassa
     kattela+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kattelemasta
     kattela+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kattelemhaan
     kattela+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kattelemala
     kattela+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kattelematta
